Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.1307

Effect of conversion.

(1) When a conversion becomes effective:

(a) The converted entity is:

(i) Organized under and subject to the organic law of the converted entity; and

(ii) The same entity without interruption as the converting entity;

(b) All property of the converting entity continues to be vested in the converted entity without transfer, reversion, or impairment;

(c) All debts, obligations, and other liabilities of the converting entity continue as debts, obligations, and other liabilities of the converted entity;

(d) Except as otherwise provided by law or the plan of conversion, all the rights, privileges, immunities, powers, and purposes of the converting entity remain in the converted entity;

(e) The name of the converted entity may be substituted for the name of the converting entity in any pending action or proceeding;

(f) If a converted entity is a filing entity, its public organic record is effective;

(g) The private organic rules of the converted entity which are to be in a record, if any, approved as part of the plan of conversion are effective; and

(h) The interests in the converting entity are converted, and the interest holders of the converting entity are entitled only to the rights provided to them under the plan of conversion and to any appraisal rights they have under the converting entity's organic law.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in the organic law or organic rules of the converting entity, the conversion does not give rise to any rights that an interest holder, governor, or third party would have upon a dissolution, liquidation, or winding up of the converting entity.

(3) When a conversion becomes effective, a person that did not have interest holder liability with respect to the converting entity and becomes subject to interest holder liability with respect to a domestic entity as a result of the conversion has interest holder liability only to the extent provided by the organic law of the entity and only for those debts, obligations, and other liabilities that are incurred after the conversion becomes effective.

(4) When a conversion becomes effective, the interest holder liability of a person that ceases to hold an interest in a converting entity with respect to which the person had interest holder liability is subject to the following rules:

(a) The conversion does not discharge any interest holder liability under the organic law of the converting entity to the extent the interest holder liability was incurred before the conversion became effective.

(b) The person does not have interest holder liability under the organic law of the domestic entity for any debt, obligation, or other liability that is incurred after the conversion becomes effective.

(c) The organic law of the converting entity continues to apply to the release, collection, or discharge of any interest holder liability preserved under (a) of this subsection as if the conversion had not occurred.

(d) The person has whatever rights of contribution from any other person as are provided by other law or the organic rules of the converting entity with respect to any interest holder liability preserved under (a) of this subsection as if the conversion had not occurred.

(5) A conversion does not require the entity to wind up its affairs and does not constitute or cause the dissolution of the entity.

[ 2019 c 37 s 1307.]